Oklahoma, session 2025, SB182.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 74 O.S. 2021, Section 902, as last


amended by Section 1, Chapter 280, O.S.L. 2024 (74 O.S. Supp. 2024,


Section 902), is amended to read as follows:


Section 902. As used in Section 901 et seq. of this title:


(1) “System” means the Oklahoma Public Employees Retirement


System as established by Section 901 et seq. of this title and as it


may hereafter be amended;

Req. No. 699 Page 1

RBS No. 699

(2) “Accumulated contributions” means the sum of all


contributions by a member to the System which shall be credited to


the member’s account;


(3) “Act” means Sections Section 901 to 932, inclusive, et seq.


of this title;


(4) “Actuarial equivalent” means a deferred income benefit of


equal value to the accumulated deposits or benefits when computed


upon the basis of the actuarial tables in use by the System;


(5) “Actuarial tables” means the actuarial tables approved and


in use by the Board at any given time;


(6) “Actuary” means the actuary or firm of actuaries employed


by the Oklahoma Public Employees Retirement System Board of Trustees


at any given time;


(7) “Beneficiary” means any person named by a member to receive


any benefits as provided for by Section 901 et seq. of this title.


If there is no beneficiary living at the time of a member employee’s


death, the member’s estate shall be the beneficiary;


(8) “Board” means the Oklahoma Public Employees Retirement


System Board of Trustees;


(9) “Compensation” means all salary and wages, as defined by


the Board of Trustees, including amounts deferred under deferred


compensation agreements entered into between a member and a


participating employer, but exclusive of payment for overtime,


payable to a member of the System for personal services performed

Req. No. 699 Page 2

RBS No. 699

for a participating employer but shall not include compensation or


reimbursement for traveling, or moving expenses, or any compensation


in excess of the maximum compensation level, provided:


(a) For compensation for service prior to January 1, 1988,


the maximum compensation level shall be Twenty-five


Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00) per annum.


For compensation for service on or after January 1,


1988, through June 30, 1994, the maximum compensation


level shall be Forty Thousand Dollars ($40,000.00) per


annum.


For compensation for service on or after July 1, 1994,


through June 30, 1995, the maximum compensation level


shall be Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00) per


annum; for compensation for service on or after July


1, 1995, through June 30, 1996, the maximum


compensation level shall be Sixty Thousand Dollars


($60,000.00) per annum; for compensation for service


on or after July 1, 1996, through June 30, 1997, the


maximum compensation level shall be Seventy Thousand


Dollars ($70,000.00) per annum; and for compensation


for service on or after July 1, 1997, through June 30,


1998, the maximum compensation level shall be Eighty


Thousand Dollars ($80,000.00) per annum. For


compensation for services on or after July 1, 1998,

Req. No. 699 Page 3

RBS No. 699

there shall be no maximum compensation level for


retirement purposes.


(b) Compensation for retirement purposes shall include any


amount of elective salary reduction under Section 457


of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, and


any amount of nonelective salary reduction under


Section 414(h) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986,


as amended.


(c) Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary, the


compensation taken into account for any employee in


determining the contribution or benefit accruals for


any plan year is limited to the annual compensation


limit under Section 401(a)(17) of the federal Internal


Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.


(d) Current A current appointed members member of the


Oklahoma Tax Commission whose salary is


constitutionally limited and is less than the highest


salary allowed by law for his or her position shall be


allowed, within ninety (90) days from March 21, 2001,


to make an election to use the highest salary allowed


by law for the position to which the member was


appointed for the purposes of making contributions and


determination of retirement benefits. Such election


shall be irrevocable and be in writing. Reappointment

Req. No. 699 Page 4

RBS No. 699

to the same office shall not permit a new election.


Members appointed to the Oklahoma Tax Commission after


the March 21, 2001, shall make such election, pursuant


to this subparagraph, within ninety (90) days of


taking office;


(10) “Credited service” means the sum of participating service,


prior service and elected service;


(11) “Dependent” means a parent, child, or spouse of a member


who is dependent upon the member for at least one-half (1/2) of the


member’s support;


(12) “Effective date” means the date upon which the System


becomes effective by operation of law;


(13) “Eligible employer” means the state and any county, county


hospital, city or town, conservation districts, circuit engineering


districts, and any public or private trust in which a county, city,


or town participates and is the primary beneficiary, is to be an


eligible employer for the purpose of Section 901 et seq. of this


title only, whose employees are covered by Social Security and are


not covered by or eligible for another retirement plan authorized


under the laws of this state which is in operation on the initial


entry date. Emergency medical service districts may join the System


upon proper application to the Board. Provided, affiliation by a


county hospital shall be in the form of a resolution adopted by the


board of control.

Req. No. 699 Page 5

RBS No. 699

(a) If a class or several classes of employees of any


above-defined employers are covered by Social Security


and are not covered by or eligible for and will not


become eligible for another retirement plan authorized


under the laws of this state, which is in operation on


the effective date May 6, 1963, such employer shall be


deemed an eligible employer, but only with respect to


that class or those classes of employees as defined in


this section.


(b) A class or several classes of employees who are


covered by Social Security and are not covered by or


eligible for and will not become eligible for another


retirement plan authorized under the laws of this


state, which is in operation on the effective date May


6, 1963, and when the qualifications for employment in


such class or classes are set by state law; and when


such class or classes of employees are employed by a


county or municipal government pursuant to such


qualifications; and when the services provided by such


employees are of such nature that they qualify for


matching by or contributions from state or federal


funds administered by an agency of state government


which qualifies as a participating employer, then the


agency of state government administering the state or

Req. No. 699 Page 6

RBS No. 699

federal funds shall be deemed an eligible employer,


but only with respect to that class or those classes


of employees as defined in this subsection; provided,


that the required contributions to the retirement plan


may be withheld from the contributions of state or


federal funds administered by the state agency and


transmitted to the System on the same basis as the


employee and employer contributions are transmitted


for the direct employees of the state agency. The


retirement or eligibility for retirement under the


provisions of law providing pensions for service as a


volunteer firefighter shall not render any person


ineligible for participation in the benefits provided


for in Section 901 et seq. of this title. An employee


of any public or private trust in which a county,


city, or town participates and is the primary


beneficiary shall be deemed to be an eligible employee


for the purpose of Section 901 et seq. of this title


only.


(c) All employees of the George Nigh Rehabilitation


Institute who elected to retain membership in the


System, pursuant to Section 913.7 of this title, shall


continue to be eligible employees for the purposes of


Section 901 et seq. of this title. The George Nigh

Req. No. 699 Page 7

RBS No. 699

Rehabilitation Institute shall be considered a


participating employer only for such employees.


(d) All employees of CompSource Mutual Insurance Company


who retain membership in the Oklahoma Public Employees


Retirement System pursuant to Section 913.9 of this


title shall continue to be eligible employees for the


purposes of the Oklahoma Public Employees Retirement


System. CompSource Mutual Insurance Company shall be


considered a participating employer only for such


employees.


(e) All employees of a successor organization, as defined


by Section 5-60.12 of Title 2 of the Oklahoma


Statutes, who retain membership in the Oklahoma Public


Employees Retirement System pursuant to Section 5-


60.35 of Title 2 of the Oklahoma Statutes shall


continue to be eligible employees for the purposes of


the Oklahoma Public Employees Retirement System. A


successor organization shall be considered a


participating employer only for such employees.


(f) A participating employer of the Teachers’ Retirement


System of Oklahoma, who has one or more employees who


have made an election pursuant to enabling legislation


to retain membership in the System as a result of


change in administration, shall be considered a

Req. No. 699 Page 8

RBS No. 699

participating employer of the Oklahoma Public


Employees Retirement System only for such employees;


(14) “Employee” means any officer or employee of a


participating employer, whose employment is not seasonal or


temporary and whose employment requires at least one thousand


(1,000) hours of work per year and whose salary or wage is equal to


the hourly rate of the monthly minimum wage for state employees.


For those eligible employers outlined in Section 910 of this title,


the rate shall be equal to the hourly rate of the monthly minimum


wage for that employer. Each employer, whose minimum wage is less


than the state’s minimum wage, shall inform the System of the


minimum wage for that employer. This notification shall be by


resolution of the governing body.


(a) Any employee of the county extension agents who is not


currently participating in the Teachers’ Retirement


System of Oklahoma shall be a member of this System.


(b) Eligibility shall not include any employee who is a


contributing member of the United States Civil Service


Retirement System.


(c) It shall be mandatory for an officer, appointee, or


employee of the office of district attorney to become


a member of this System if he or she is not currently


participating in a county retirement system. Provided


further, that if an officer, appointee, or employee of

Req. No. 699 Page 9

RBS No. 699

the office of district attorney is currently


participating in such county retirement system, he or


she is ineligible for this System as long as he or she


is eligible for such county retirement system. Any


eligible officer, appointee, or employee of the office


of district attorney shall be given credit for prior


service as defined in this section. The provisions


outlined in Section 917 of this title shall apply to


those employees who have previously withdrawn their


contributions.


(d) Eligibility shall also not include any officer or


employee of the Oklahoma Employment Security


Commission, except for those officers and employees of


the Commission electing to transfer to this System


pursuant to the provisions of Section 910.1 of this


title or any other class of officers or employees


specifically exempted by the laws of this state,


unless there be is a consolidation as provided by


Section 912 of this title. Employees of the Oklahoma


Employment Security Commission who are ineligible for


enrollment in the Oklahoma Employment Security


Commission Retirement Plan, that was in effect on


January 1, 1964, shall become members of this System.



Req. No. 699 Page 10

RBS No. 699

(e) Any employee employed by the Legislative Service


Bureau, Senate, or House of Representatives for the


full duration of a regular legislative session shall


be eligible for membership in the System regardless of


classification as a temporary employee and may


participate in the System during the regular


legislative session at the option of the employee.


For purposes of this subparagraph, the determination


of whether an employee is employed for the full


duration of a regular legislative session shall be


made by the Legislative Service Bureau if such


employee is employed by the Legislative Service


Bureau, the Senate if such employee is employed by the


Senate, or by the House of Representatives if such


employee is employed by the House of Representatives.


Each regular legislative session during which the


legislative employee or an employee of the Legislative


Service Bureau participates full time shall be counted


as six (6) months of full-time participating service.


(i) Except as otherwise provided by this


subparagraph, once a temporary session employee


makes a choice to participate or not, the choice


shall be binding for all future legislative


sessions during which the employee is employed.

Req. No. 699 Page 11

RBS No. 699

(ii) Notwithstanding the provisions of division (i) of


this subparagraph, any employee, who is eligible


for membership in the System because of the


provisions of this subparagraph and who was


employed by the Senate or House of


Representatives after January 1, 1989, may file


an election, in a manner specified by the Board,


to participate as a member of the System prior to


September 1, 1989.


(iii) Notwithstanding the provisions of division (i) of


this subparagraph, a temporary legislative


session employee who elected to become a member


of the System may withdraw from the System


effective the day such employee elected to


participate in the System upon written request to


the Board. Any such request must be received by


the Board prior to October 1, 1990. All employee


contributions made by the temporary legislative


session employee shall be returned to the


employee without interest within four (4) months


of receipt of the written request.


(iv) A member of the System who did not initially


elect to participate as a member of the System


pursuant to this subparagraph shall be able to

Req. No. 699 Page 12

RBS No. 699

acquire service performed as a temporary


legislative session employee for periods of


service performed prior to the date upon which


the person became a member of the System if:


a. the member files an election with the System


not later than December 31, 2000, to


purchase the prior service; and


b. the member makes payment to the System of


the actuarial cost of the service credit


pursuant to subsection A of Section 913.5 of


this title. The provisions of Section 913.5


of this title shall be applicable to the


purchase of the service credit, including


the provisions for determining service


credit in the event of incomplete payment


due to cessation of payments, death,


termination of employment, or retirement,


but the payment may extend for a period not


to exceed ninety-six (96) months;


(15) “Entry date” means the date on which an eligible employer


joins the System. The first entry date pursuant to Section 901 et


seq. of this title shall be January 1, 1964;





Req. No. 699 Page 13

RBS No. 699

(16) “Executive Director” means the managing officer of the


System employed by the Board under Section 901 et seq. of this


title;


(17) “Federal Internal Revenue Code” means the federal Internal


Revenue Code of 1954 or 1986, as amended, and as applicable to a


governmental plan as in effect on July 1, 1999;


(18) “Final average compensation” means the average annual


compensation, including amounts deferred under deferred compensation


agreements entered into between a member and a participating


employer, up to, but not exceeding the maximum compensation levels


as provided in paragraph (9) of this section received during the


highest three (3) of the last ten (10) years of participating


service immediately preceding retirement or termination of


employment and with respect to members whose first participating


service occurs on or after July 1, 2013, the compensation received


during the highest five (5) of the last ten (10) years of


participating service immediately preceding retirement or


termination of employment. Provided, no member shall retire with a


final average compensation unless the member has made the required


contributions on such compensation, as defined by the Board of


Trustees;


(19) “Fiscal year” means the period commencing July 1 of any


year and ending June 30 of the next year. The fiscal year is the


plan year for purposes of the federal Internal Revenue Code of 1986,

Req. No. 699 Page 14

RBS No. 699

as amended; however, the calendar year is the limitation year for


purposes of Section 415 of the federal Internal Revenue Code of


1986, as amended;


(20) “Fund” means the Oklahoma Public Employees Retirement Fund


as created by Section 901 et seq. of this title;


(21) “Leave of absence” means a period of absence from


employment without pay, authorized and approved by the employer and


acknowledged to the Board, and which after the effective date May 6,


1963, does not exceed two (2) years;


(22) “Member” means an eligible employee or elected official


who is in the System and is making the required employee or elected


official contributions, or any former employee or elected official


who shall have made the required contributions to the System and


shall have not received a refund or withdrawal;


(23) “Military service” means service in the Armed Forces of


the United States by an honorably discharged person during the


following time periods, as reflected on such person’s Defense


Department Form 214, not to exceed five (5) years for combined


participating and/or prior service, as follows:


(a) during the following periods, including the beginning


and ending dates, and only for the periods served,


from:


(i) April 6, 1917, to November 11, 1918, commonly


referred to as World War I,

Req. No. 699 Page 15

RBS No. 699

(ii) September 16, 1940, to December 7, 1941, as a


member of the 45th Division,


(iii) December 7, 1941, to December 31, 1946, commonly


referred to as World War II,


(iv) June 27, 1950, to January 31, 1955, commonly


referred to as the Korean Conflict or the Korean


War,


(v) February 28, 1961, to May 7, 1975, commonly


referred to as the Vietnam era, except that:


a. for the period from February 28, 1961, to


August 4, 1964, military service shall only


include service in the Republic of Vietnam


during that period, and


b. for purposes of determining eligibility for


education and training benefits, such period


shall end on December 31, 1976, or


(vi) August 1, 1990, to December 31, 1991, commonly


referred to as the Gulf War, the Persian Gulf


War, or Operation Desert Storm, but excluding any


person who served on active duty for training


only, unless discharged from such active duty for


a service-connected disability;


(b) during a period of war or combat military operation


other than a conflict, war, or era listed in

Req. No. 699 Page 16

RBS No. 699

subparagraph (a) of this paragraph, beginning on the


date of Congressional authorization, Congressional


resolution, or Executive Order of the President of the


United States, for the use of the Armed Forces of the


United States in a war or combat military operation,


if such war or combat military operation lasted for a


period of ninety (90) days or more, for a person who


served, and only for the period served, in the area of


responsibility of the war or combat military


operation, but excluding a person who served on active


duty for training only, unless discharged from such


active duty for a service-connected disability, and


provided that the burden of proof of military service


during this period shall be with the member, who must


present appropriate documentation establishing such


service.


An eligible member under this paragraph shall include only those


persons who shall have served during the times or in the areas


prescribed in this paragraph, and only if such person provides


appropriate documentation in such time and manner as required by the


System to establish such military service prescribed in this


paragraph, or for service pursuant to subdivision a of division (v)


of subparagraph (a) of this paragraph those persons who were awarded


service medals, as authorized by the United States Department of

Req. No. 699 Page 17

RBS No. 699

Defense as reflected in the veteran’s Defense Department Form 214,


related to the Vietnam Conflict for service prior to August 5, 1964;


(24) “Normal retirement date” means the date on which a member


may retire with full retirement benefits as provided in Section 901


et seq. of this title, such date being whichever occurs first:


(a) the first day of the month coinciding with or


following a member’s:


(1) sixty-second birthday with respect to members


whose first participating service occurs prior to


November 1, 2011, or


(2) sixty-fifth birthday with respect to members


whose first participating service occurs on or


after November 1, 2011, or with respect to


members whose first participating service occurs


on or after November 1, 2011, who reach a minimum


age of sixty (60) years and who also reach a


normal retirement date pursuant to subparagraph c


of this paragraph,


(b) for any person who initially became a member prior to


July 1, 1992, and who does not reach a normal


retirement date pursuant to division (1) of


subparagraph (a) of this paragraph, the first day of


the month coinciding with or following the date at


which the sum of a member’s age and number of years of

Req. No. 699 Page 18

RBS No. 699

credited service total eighty (80); such a normal


retirement date will also apply to any person who


became a member of the sending system as defined in


Section 901 et seq. of this title, prior to July 1,


1992, regardless of whether there were breaks in


service after July 1, 1992,


(c) for any person who became a member after June 30,


1992, but prior to November 1, 2011, and who does not


reach a normal retirement date pursuant to division


(1) of subparagraph (a) of this paragraph, the first


day of the month coinciding with or following the date


at which the sum of a member’s age and number of years


of credited service total ninety (90),


(d) in addition to subparagraphs (a), (b) and (c) of this


paragraph, the first day of the month coinciding with


or following a member’s completion of at least twenty


(20) years of full-time-equivalent employment as:


(i) a correctional or probation and parole officer


with the Department of Corrections and at the


time of retirement, the member was a correctional


or probation and parole officer with the


Department of Corrections,


(ii) a correctional officer, probation and parole


officer or fugitive apprehension agent with the

Req. No. 699 Page 19

RBS No. 699

Department of Corrections who is in such position


on June 30, 2004, or who is hired after June 30,


2004, and who receives a promotion or change in


job classification after June 30, 2004, to


another position in the Department of


Corrections, so long as such officer or agent has


at least five (5) years of service as a


correctional officer, probation and parole


officer or fugitive apprehension agent with the


Department, has twenty (20) years of full-time-


equivalent employment with the Department and was


employed by the Department at the time of


retirement,


(iii) a firefighter with the Military Department of the


State of Oklahoma either employed for the first


time on or after July 1, 2002, or who was


employed prior to July 1, 2002, in such position


and who makes the election authorized by division


(2) of subparagraph b of paragraph (9) of


subsection A of Section 915 of this title and at


the time of retirement, the member was a


firefighter with the Military Department of the


State of Oklahoma, and such member has at least


twenty (20) years of credited service upon which

Req. No. 699 Page 20

RBS No. 699

the two and one-half percent (2 1/2%) multiplier


will be used in calculating the retirement


benefit,


(iv) a public safety officer employed by the Grand


River Dam Authority for the first time on or


after July 1, 2016,


(v) a deputy sheriff or jailer employed by any county


that is a participating employer in the System


for the first time as a deputy sheriff or jailer


on or after November 1, 2020, or


(vi) beginning November 1, 2024, a deputy sheriff or


jailer employed by any county that is a


participating employer in the System for the


first time as a deputy sheriff or jailer before


November 1, 2020, including those who make the


election authorized by division (2) of


subparagraph b of paragraph (10) of subsection A


of Section 915 of this title, and at the time of


retirement, if the member was a deputy sheriff or


jailer employed by the participating county, and


such member has at least twenty (20) years of


credited service upon which the two and one-half


percent (2 1/2%) multiplier will be used in


calculating the retirement benefit,

Req. No. 699 Page 21

RBS No. 699

(vii) a law enforcement agent certified by the Council


on Law Enforcement Education and Training (CLEET)


and employed by the Department of Human Services


Office of Inspector General who:


a. is employed by the Office for the first time


on or after the effective date of this act,


or


b. was employed by the Office prior to the


effective date of this act and makes an


irrevocable election pursuant to paragraph


(9) of subsection A of Section 915 of this


title, or


(viii) a Resident Care Specialist for the Office


of Juvenile Affairs who:


a. is employed by the Office for the first time


on or after the effective date of this act,


or


b. was employed by the Office prior to the


effective date of this act and makes an


irrevocable election pursuant to paragraph


(9) of subsection A of Section 915 of this


title,


(e) for those fugitive apprehension agents who retire on


or after July 1, 2002, the first day of the month

Req. No. 699 Page 22

RBS No. 699

coinciding with or following a member’s completion of


at least twenty (20) years of full-time-equivalent


employment as a fugitive apprehension agent with the


Department of Corrections and at the time of


retirement, the member was a fugitive apprehension


agent with the Department of Corrections, or


(f) for any member who was continuously employed by an


entity or institution within The Oklahoma State System


of Higher Education and whose initial employment with


such entity or institution was prior to July 1, 1992,


and who without a break in service of more than thirty


(30) days became employed by an employer participating


in the Oklahoma Public Employees Retirement System,


the first day of the month coinciding with or


following the date at which the sum of the member’s


age and number of years of credited service total


eighty (80);


(25) “Participating employer” means an eligible employer who


has agreed to make contributions to the System on behalf of its


employees;


(26) “Participating service” means the period of employment


after the entry date for which credit is granted a member.


Provided, on or after the effective date of this act November 1,


2023, military service credit purchased under Section 913.8 of this

Req. No. 699 Page 23

RBS No. 699

title shall only be considered “participating service” participating


service if such service is immediately preceded by a period of


employment with a participating employer and followed by a return to


service as an employee with the same or another participating


employer within ninety (90) days immediately following discharge


from such military service;


(27) “Prior service” means the period of employment of a member


by an eligible employer prior to the member’s entry date for which


credit is granted a member under Section 901 et seq. of this title.


Provided, on or after the effective date of this act November 1,


2023, “prior service” prior service shall also include service


purchased under Section 913.8 of this title which does not meet the


requirements of paragraph 26 of this section;


(28) “Retirant” or “retiree” means a member who has retired


under the System;


(29) “Retirement benefit” means a monthly income with benefits


accruing from the first day of the month coinciding with or


following retirement and ending on the last day of the month in


which death occurs or the actuarial equivalent thereof paid in such


manner as specified by the member pursuant to Section 901 et seq. of


this title or as otherwise allowed to be paid at the discretion of


the Board;





Req. No. 699 Page 24

RBS No. 699

(30) “Retirement coordinator” means the individual designated


by each participating employer through whom System transactions and


communication shall be directed;


(31) “Social Security” means the old-age survivors and


disability section of the federal Social Security Act;


(32) “Total disability” means a physical or mental disability


accepted for disability benefits by the federal Social Security


System Administration;


(33) “Service-connected disability benefits” means military


service benefits which are for a service-connected disability rated


at twenty percent (20%) or more by the Veterans Administration


United States Department of Veterans Affairs or the Armed Forces of


the United States;


(34) “Elected official” means a person elected to a state


office in the legislative or executive branch of state government or


a person elected to a county office for a definite number of years


and shall include an individual who is appointed to fill the


unexpired term of an elected state official;


(35) “Elected service” means the period of service as an


elected official;


(36) “Limitation year” means the year used in applying the


limitations of Section 415 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as


amended, which year shall be the calendar year; and



Req. No. 699 Page 25

RBS No. 699

(37) “Public safety officers of the Grand River Dam Authority”


means those persons hired by the Grand River Dam Authority on or


after March 21, 2001, who are certified by the Council on Law


Enforcement Education and Training or an equivalent certifying


entity for law enforcement personnel training and who perform law


enforcement functions as part of their regularly assigned duties and


responsibilities on a full-time basis. With respect to any public


safety officer hired by the Grand River Dam Authority on or after


March 21, 2001, any earned benefits or credits toward retirement


benefits from previous participation within the Oklahoma Public


Employees Retirement System or the Oklahoma Law Enforcement


Retirement System shall remain within that system.


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 74 O.S. 2021, Section 915, as


amended by Section 2, Chapter 280, O.S.L. 2024 (74 O.S. Supp. 2024,


Section 915), is amended to read as follows:


Section 915. A. (1) Except as otherwise provided in this


subsection and as provided for elected officials in Section 913.4 of


this title, any member who shall retire on or after the member’s


normal retirement date shall be entitled to receive an annual


retirement benefit equal to two percent (2%) of the member’s final


average compensation as determined pursuant to paragraph (18) of


Section 902 of this title, multiplied by the number of years of


credited service that has been credited to the member in accordance



Req. No. 699 Page 26

RBS No. 699

with the provisions of Section 913 of this title other than years


credited pursuant to paragraph (2) of this subsection.


(2) Effective January 1, 2004, except as otherwise provided for


elected officials in Section 913.4 of this title and except for


those members making contributions pursuant to paragraphs (b), (c),


(d), (e) and, (f), and (g) of subsection (1) of Section 919.1 of


this title, any member who shall retire shall be entitled to receive


an annual retirement benefit equal to two and one-half percent (2


1/2%) of the member’s final average compensation as determined


pursuant to paragraph (18) of Section 902 of this title, multiplied


by the number of full years of participating service after January


1, 2004, that have been credited to the member in accordance with


the provisions of Section 913 of this title and only for those full


years of participating service for which contributions have been


made pursuant to paragraph (g) (h) of subsection (1) of Section


919.1 of this title. The two and one-half percent (2 1/2%)


multiplier shall not apply to purchased service, purchased or


granted military service, or transferred service. In order to


receive the two and one-half percent (2 1/2%) multiplier in


computing retirement benefits, an active member shall make an


irrevocable written election to pay the contributions pursuant to


paragraph (g) (h) of subsection (1) of Section 919.1 of this title.


The two and one-half percent (2 1/2%) multiplier pursuant to this


paragraph shall not apply to additional years of service credit

Req. No. 699 Page 27

RBS No. 699

attributed to sick leave pursuant to paragraph 7 of subsection B of


Section 913 of this title and fractional years pursuant to


subsection C of Section 913 of this title and shall be attributable


only to the participating service credited after the election of the


member.


(3) The minimum final average compensation for any person who


becomes a member of the Oklahoma Public Employees Retirement System


on or after July 1, 1995 and who had:


a. and who had twenty (20) or more years of credited


service within the System as of the member’s


retirement date shall be no less than Thirteen


Thousand Eight Hundred Dollars ($13,800.00) per annum,


b. and who had at least fifteen (15) but not more than


nineteen (19) years of credited service within the


System as of the member’s retirement date shall be no


less than Six Thousand Nine Hundred Dollars


($6,900.00) per annum, or


c. and who had less than fifteen (15) years of credited


service within the System as of the member’s


retirement date shall not be eligible for any minimum


amount of final average compensation and the member’s


final average compensation shall be the final average


compensation as defined by paragraph (18) of Section


902 of this title.

Req. No. 699 Page 28

RBS No. 699

(4) Provided, further, any member who has elected a vested


benefit pursuant to Section 917 of this title shall be entitled to


receive benefits as outlined in this section except the percent


factor and the member’s maximum compensation level in effect the


date the member’s employment was terminated with a participating


employer shall be applicable.


(5) Any member who is a correctional officer or a probation and


parole officer employed by the Department of Corrections at the time


of retirement and who retires on or before June 30, 2000, shall be


entitled to receive an annual retirement benefit equal to two and


one-half percent (2 1/2%) of the final average compensation of the


member not to exceed Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00) and


two percent (2%) of the final average salary in excess of Twenty-


five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00) but not exceeding the maximum


compensation level as provided in paragraph (9) of Section 902 of


this title, multiplied by the number of years of service as a


correctional officer or a probation and parole officer; provided,


any years accrued prior to July 1, 1990, as a correctional officer


or a probation and parole officer by a member who is employed as a


correctional officer or a probation and parole officer on July 1,


1990, shall be calculated for retirement purposes at two and one-


quarter percent (2 1/4%) of the final average compensation of the


member not to exceed Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00) and


two percent (2%) of the final average salary in excess of Twenty-

Req. No. 699 Page 29

RBS No. 699

five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00) but not exceeding the maximum


compensation level as provided in paragraph (9) of Section 902 of


this title, multiplied by the number of years of such service and


any years in excess of twenty (20) years as such an officer or years


credited to the member in accordance with the provisions of Section


913 of this title shall be calculated for retirement purposes at two


percent (2%) of the final average compensation of the member


multiplied by the number of years of such service. Any person who


contributes to the System as a correctional officer or a probation


and parole officer as provided in paragraph (b) or (c) of subsection


(1) of Section 919.1 of this title, on or before June 30, 2000, but


who does not make such contributions after June 30, 2000, and who


does not qualify for normal retirement under subparagraph (c) of


paragraph (24) of Section 902 of this title shall have retirement


benefits for each year of full-time-equivalent participating service


as a correctional or a probation and parole officer after July 1,


1990, computed on two and one-half percent (2 1/2%) of the final


average compensation based upon those years as a correctional


officer or a probation and parole officer. Provided, further, any


fugitive apprehension agent shall be entitled to receive benefits as


outlined in this act Section 901 et seq. of this title for service


as a fugitive apprehension agent prior to July 1, 2002, only upon


payment to the System of the employee contributions which would have


been paid if such fugitive apprehension agent had been covered by

Req. No. 699 Page 30

RBS No. 699

this section prior to the effective date of this act July 1, 2002,


plus interest of not to exceed ten percent (10%) as determined by


the Oklahoma Public Employees Retirement System Board of Trustees.


The Department of Corrections may make the employee contribution and


interest payment on behalf of such member.


(6) Any member who is a correctional officer, a probation and


parole officer or a fugitive apprehension agent employed by the


Department of Corrections at the time of retirement and who retires


on or after July 1, 2002, shall be entitled to receive an annual


retirement benefit equal to two and one-half percent (2 1/2%) of the


final average compensation of the member, but not exceeding the


maximum compensation level as provided in paragraph (18) of Section


902 of this title, multiplied by the number of years of service as a


correctional officer, a probation and parole officer, or a fugitive


apprehension agent, and any years in excess of twenty (20) years as


such an officer or agent, or years credited to the member in


accordance with the provisions of Section 913 of this title, shall


be calculated for retirement purposes at two percent (2%) of the


final average compensation of the member multiplied by the number of


years of such service. For purposes of this paragraph, “final


average compensation” shall be determined by computing the average


annual salary, in the manner prescribed by paragraph (18) of Section


902 of this title, for the highest three (3) years of the last ten


(10) years of participating service immediately preceding retirement

Req. No. 699 Page 31

RBS No. 699

or termination of employment for all years of service performed by


such member, both for years of service performed as a correctional


officer, probation and parole officer, or fugitive apprehension


agent, not in excess of twenty (20) years, and for years of service


performed in excess of twenty (20) years, whether as a correctional


officer, probation and parole officer, fugitive apprehension agent,


or other position unless the computation of benefits would result in


a lower retirement benefit amount than if final average compensation


were to be computed as otherwise provided by this paragraph. “Final


average compensation” Final average compensation shall be determined


by computing the average annual salary for the highest five (5) of


the last ten (10) years of participating service immediately


preceding retirement or termination of employment, with respect to


members whose first participating service occurs on or after July 1,


2013.


(7) Any member who is a correctional officer, a probation and


parole officer, or a fugitive apprehension agent who has at least


five (5) years of service as a correctional officer, a probation and


parole officer, or a fugitive apprehension agent who is in such


position on June 30, 2004, or who is hired after June 30, 2004, in


such position, and who receives a promotion or change in job


classification after June 30, 2004, to another position in the


Department of Corrections, and who is employed by the Department of


Corrections at the time of retirement and who retires on or after

Req. No. 699 Page 32

RBS No. 699

July 1, 2004, shall be entitled to receive an annual retirement


benefit equal to two and one-half percent (2 1/2%) of the final


average compensation of the member, but not exceeding the maximum


compensation level as provided in paragraph (18) of Section 902 of


this title, multiplied by the number of years of service with the


Department of Corrections and any years in excess of twenty (20)


years with the Department or years credited to the member in


accordance with the provisions of Section 913 of this title, shall


be calculated for retirement purposes at two percent (2%) of the


final average compensation of the member multiplied by the number of


years of such service. For purposes of this paragraph, “final


average compensation” shall be determined by computing the average


annual salary, in the manner prescribed by paragraph (18) of Section


902 of this title, for the highest three (3) years of the last ten


(10) years of participating service immediately preceding retirement


or termination of employment for all years of service performed by


such member with the Department. “Final average compensation” Final


average compensation shall be determined by computing the average


annual salary for the highest five (5) of the last ten (10) years of


participating service immediately preceding retirement or


termination of employment, with respect to members whose first


participating service occurs on or after July 1, 2013.


(8) Any person who contributed to the System as a correctional


officer, a probation and parole officer, or a fugitive apprehension

Req. No. 699 Page 33

RBS No. 699

agent as provided in paragraph (b) or (c) of subsection (1) of


Section 919.1 of this title, and who retires under normal retirement


or early retirement on or after January 1, 2004, under paragraph


(24) of Section 902 of this title, and any public safety officer


described by paragraph (37) of Section 902 of this title hired on or


after the effective date of this act July 1, 2016, by the Grand


River Dam Authority and who retires on or after the effective date


of this act July 1, 2016, shall have retirement benefits for each


year of full-time-equivalent participating service as a correctional


officer, a probation and parole officer or a fugitive apprehension


agent, or Grand River Dam public safety officer computed on two and


one-half percent (2 1/2%) of the final average compensation based


upon those years as a correctional officer, a probation and parole


officer, a fugitive apprehension agent, or a Grand River Dam public


safety officer. For purposes of this paragraph, “final average


compensation” shall be determined by computing the average annual


salary, in the manner prescribed by paragraph (18) of Section 902 of


this title, for the highest three (3) years of the last ten (10)


years of participating service immediately preceding retirement or


termination of employment for all years of service performed by such


member, both for years of service performed as a correctional


officer, probation and parole officer, or fugitive apprehension


agent, or years of service performed as a Grand River Dam public


safety officer, not in excess of twenty (20) years, and for years of

Req. No. 699 Page 34

RBS No. 699

service performed in excess of twenty (20) years, whether as a


correctional officer, probation and parole officer, fugitive


apprehension agent, Grand River Dam public safety officer, or other


position unless the computation of benefits would result in a lower


retirement benefit amount than if final average compensation were to


be computed as otherwise provided by this paragraph. “Final average


compensation” Final average compensation shall be determined by


computing the average annual salary for the highest five (5) of the


last ten (10) years of participating service immediately preceding


retirement or termination of employment, with respect to members


whose first participating service occurs on or after July 1, 2013,


or with respect to Grand River Dam public safety officers whose


first participating service occurs on or after the effective date of


this act July 1, 2016.


(9) Any member who is:


a. initially on or after July 1, 2002, employed as a


firefighter for the Oklahoma Military Department of


the State of Oklahoma and who retires on or after the


member’s normal retirement date shall be entitled to


receive an annual retirement benefit equal to two and


one-half percent (2 1/2%) of the final average


compensation of the member multiplied by the number of


years of service in such service,



Req. No. 699 Page 35

RBS No. 699

b. (1) a firefighter who performs firefighting services


for the Oklahoma Military Department of the State


of Oklahoma prior to July 1, 2002, and who makes


an election in writing on a form prescribed for


this purpose by the System not later than


December 31, 2002, shall be entitled to receive a


retirement benefit based upon two and one-half


percent (2 1/2%) of the final average


compensation of the member multiplied by the


number of years of service as a firefighter with


the Oklahoma Military Department of the State of


Oklahoma on or after July 1, 2002. The election


authorized by this subdivision division shall be


irrevocable once the election is filed with the


System,


(2) a firefighter who performs firefighting services


for the Oklahoma Military Department of the State


of Oklahoma prior to July 1, 2002, and who makes


the election in division (1) of this subparagraph


may also make an election in writing on a form


prescribed for this purpose by the System not


later than December 31, 2002, to receive a


retirement benefit based upon two and one-half


percent (2 1/2%) of the final average

Req. No. 699 Page 36

RBS No. 699

compensation of the member multiplied by the


number of years of service as a firefighter with


the Oklahoma Military Department of the State of


Oklahoma prior to July 1, 2002. The election


authorized by this subdivision division shall be


irrevocable once the election is filed with the


System. Retirement benefits shall be calculated


based upon the two and one-half percent (2 1/2%)


multiplier upon payment being made pursuant to


Section 913.5 of this title,


c. a CLEET-certified law enforcement agent who performs


law enforcement services for the Department of Human


Services Office of Inspector General initially hired


on or after the effective date of this act, and who


retires on or after the member’s normal retirement


date, shall be entitled to receive an annual


retirement benefit equal to two and one-half percent


(2 1/2%) of the final average compensation of the


member multiplied by the number of years of service


for which the member was employed pursuant to this


subparagraph,


d. (1) a CLEET-certified law enforcement agent who


performs law enforcement services for the


Department of Human Services Office of Inspector

Req. No. 699 Page 37

RBS No. 699

General prior to the effective date of this act,


and who makes an irrevocable election in writing


in the form and manner prescribed by the System


not later than the end of the calendar year


following the effective date of this act, shall


be entitled to receive a retirement benefit based


upon two and one-half percent (2 1/2%) of the


final average compensation of the member


multiplied by the number of years of service of


employment under this division completed on and


after the effective date of this act,


(2) a CLEET-certified law enforcement agent who


performs law enforcement services for the


Department of Human Services Office of Inspector


General prior to the effective date of this act,


and who makes an irrevocable election under


division 1 of this subparagraph, may also make an


irrevocable election, subject to the same


provisions and conditions of the election made in


division 1 of this subparagraph, for years of


service of employment under this division prior


to the effective date of this act, and


(3) benefit calculations for a CLEET-certified law


enforcement agent who performs law enforcement

Req. No. 699 Page 38

RBS No. 699

services for the Department of Human Services


Office of Inspector General under Section 913.5


of this title shall be calculated in the same


manner as calculated under division (1) of this


subparagraph,


e. a Resident Care Specialist for the Office of Juvenile


Affairs initially hired on or after the effective date


of this act, and who retires on or after the member’s


normal retirement date, shall be entitled to receive


an annual retirement benefit equal to two and one-half


percent (2 1/2%) of the final average compensation of


the member multiplied by the number of years of


service for which the member was employed pursuant to


this subparagraph, and


f. (1) a Resident Care Specialist for the Office of


Juvenile Affairs who is hired prior to the


effective date of this act, and who makes an


irrevocable election in writing in the form and


manner prescribed by the System not later than


the end of the calendar year following the


effective date of this act, shall be entitled to


receive a retirement benefit based upon two and


one-half percent (2 1/2%) of the final average


compensation of the member multiplied by the

Req. No. 699 Page 39

RBS No. 699

number of years of service of employment under


this division completed on and after the


effective date of this act,


(2) a Resident Care Specialist for the Office of


Juvenile Affairs who is hired prior to the


effective date of this act, and who makes an


irrevocable election under division (1) of this


subparagraph, may also make an irrevocable


election, subject to the same provisions and


conditions of the election made in division (1)


of this subparagraph, for years of service of


employment under this division prior to the


effective date of this act, and


(3) benefit calculations for a Resident Care


Specialist shall be calculated in the same manner


as calculated under division (1) of this


subparagraph.


(10) Any person who contributes to the System as a deputy


sheriff or county jailer as provided in paragraph (f) of subsection


(1) of Section 919.1 of this title, and who was:


a. employed by a participating employer in the System


for the first time as a deputy sheriff or county


jailer on or after November 1, 2020, and who retires


under normal retirement or early retirement under

Req. No. 699 Page 40

RBS No. 699

division (v) of subparagraph (d) of paragraph (24) of


Section 902 of this title, shall have retirement


benefits for each year of full-time-equivalent


participating service as a deputy sheriff or county


jailer computed on two and one-half percent (2 1/2%)


of the final average compensation based upon those


years as a deputy sheriff or county jailer, and any


years in excess of twenty (20) years as a deputy


sheriff or county jailer, or years credited to the


member in accordance with the provisions of Section


913 of this title, shall be calculated for retirement


purposes at two percent (2%) of the final average


compensation of the member multiplied by the number


of years of such service, or


b. (1) employed by a participating employer in the


System for the first time as a deputy sheriff or


county jailer before November 1, 2020, and who


retires under the normal retirement or early


retirement under division (vi) of subparagraph


(d) of paragraph (24) of Section 902 of this


title, shall be entitled to receive a retirement


benefit based on two and one-half percent (2


1/2%) of the final average compensation of the


member multiplied based on the number of years of

Req. No. 699 Page 41

RBS No. 699

service as a deputy sheriff or county jailer with


any county participating in the System on or


after November 1, 2024,


(2) employed by a participating employer in the


System for the first time as a deputy sheriff or


county jailer before November 1, 2020, and who


retires under the normal retirement or early


retirement under division (vi) of subparagraph


(d) of paragraph (24) of Section 902 of this


title, and who makes an election in writing not


later than July 1, 2026, on a form prescribed for


this purpose by the System, shall be entitled to


a retirement benefit based upon two and one-half


percent (2 1/2%) of the final average


compensation of the member multiplied by the


number of years of service prior to November 1,


2024, as a deputy sheriff or county jailer


employed by any county that is a participating


employer in the System. The election authorized


by this subparagraph division shall be


irrevocable once the election is filed with the


System. Retirement benefits shall be calculated


based upon the two and one-half percent (2 1/2%)


multiplier upon payment being made pursuant to

Req. No. 699 Page 42

RBS No. 699

Section 913.5 of this title. Any person


otherwise qualifying under this subparagraph


division, but who is not employed as a deputy


sheriff or county jailer on November 1, 2024, and


who is reemployed as a deputy sheriff or county


jailer with a county that is a participating


employer in the System after November 1, 2024,


shall have six (6) months from the initial date


of reemployment to make the election authorized


in this subparagraph division. The actuarial


purchase of any service credit accrued prior to


November 1, 2024, as a deputy sheriff or county


jailer employed by a county that is a


participating employer in the System as set forth


in this subparagraph division shall cancel such


corresponding service and shall not be used to


compute the retirement benefit under any other


provision except as provided in this subparagraph


division. In no event shall the service


purchased under this subparagraph division cause


the member to receive a retirement benefit for


the same service in any other plan. Any


purchased service under this subparagraph


division shall comply with the applicable

Req. No. 699 Page 43

RBS No. 699

provisions of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986,


as amended, and rules adopted by the Board of


Trustees.


c. For purposes of paragraph (10) this paragraph, “final


average compensation” shall be determined by computing


the average annual salary, in the manner prescribed by


paragraph (18) of Section 902 of this title, both for


years of service performed as a deputy sheriff or


county jailer not in excess of twenty (20) years, and


for years of service performed in excess of twenty


(20) years, whether as a deputy sheriff or county


jailer.


(11) Upon death of a retiree, there shall be paid to his or her


beneficiary an amount equal to the excess, if any, of his or her


accumulated contributions over the sum of all retirement benefit


payments made.


(12) Such annual retirement benefits shall be paid in equal


monthly installments, except that the Board may provide for the


payment of retirement benefits which total less than Two Hundred


Forty Dollars ($240.00) a year on other than a monthly basis.


(13) Pursuant to the rules established by the Board, a retiree


receiving monthly benefits from the System may authorize warrant


deductions for any products currently offered to active state


employees through the Employees Benefits Council Oklahoma Employees

Req. No. 699 Page 44

RBS No. 699

Insurance and Benefits Board, provided that product is offered to


state retirees as a group and has a minimum participation of five


hundred state retirees. The System has no responsibility for the


marketing, enrolling or administration of such products, but shall


retain a processing fee of two percent (2%) of the gross deductions


for the products. Retirement benefit deductions shall be made for


membership dues for any statewide association for which payroll


deductions are authorized pursuant to subsection B of Section 34.70


of Title 62 of the Oklahoma Statutes for retired members of any


state-supported retirement system, upon proper authorization given


by the member to the board from which the member or beneficiary is


currently receiving retirement benefits.


B. A member shall be considered disabled if such member


qualifies for the payment of Social Security disability benefits, or


the payment of benefits pursuant to the Railroad Retirement Act of


1974, Section 231 et seq. of Title 45 of the United States Code, and


shall be eligible for benefits hereunder upon proof of such


disability, provided such member is an active regularly scheduled


employee with a participating employer at the time of injury or


inception of illness or disease resulting in subsequent


certification of eligibility for Social Security disability benefits


by reason of such injury, illness or disease, providing provided


such disability is certified by the Social Security Administration


within one (1) year after the last date physically on the job and

Req. No. 699 Page 45

RBS No. 699

after completion of at least eight (8) years of participating


service or combined prior and participating service or resulting in


subsequent certification of eligibility of disability by the


Railroad Retirement Board providing provided such certification is


made by the Railroad Retirement Board within one (1) year after the


last date physically on the job and after completion of at least


eight (8) years of participating service or combined prior and


participating service. The member shall submit to the Oklahoma


Public Employees Retirement System the Social Security Award Notice


or the Railroad Retirement Award Notice certifying the date of


entitlement for disability benefits, as issued by the Social


Security Administration, United States Department of Health and


Human Services or the Railroad Retirement Board. Disability


benefits shall become effective on the date of entitlement as


established by the Social Security Administration or the Railroad


Retirement Board, but not before the first day of the month


following removal from the payroll, whichever is later, and final


approval by the Oklahoma Public Employees Retirement System.


Benefits shall be based upon length of service and compensation as


of the date of disability, without actuarial reduction because of


commencement prior to the normal retirement date. The only optional


form of benefit payment available for disability benefits is Option


A as provided for in Section 918 of this title. Option A must be


elected in accordance with the provisions of Section 918 of this

Req. No. 699 Page 46

RBS No. 699

title. Benefit payments shall cease upon the member’s recovery from


disability prior to the normal retirement date. Future benefits, if


any, shall be paid based upon length of service and compensation as


of the date of disability. In the event that disability ceases and


the member returns to employment within the System, credited service


to the date of disability shall be restored, and future benefits


shall be determined accordingly.


C. A member who incurred a disability pursuant to subsection B


of this section on or after July 1, 1999, and who has retired from


the System with an early retirement benefit pending certification


from the Social Security Administration or the Railroad Retirement


Board shall receive a retirement benefit not less than the


disability retirement benefit provided by subsection B of this


section once the System receives a Social Security Award Notice or a


Railroad Retirement Award Notice pursuant to subsection B of this


section and a completed Application application for Disability


Benefits disability benefits. In addition, such member shall


receive the difference, if any, between the early retirement benefit


and the disability benefit from the date the Social Security


Administration or the Railroad Retirement Board establishes


disability entitlement.


D. Any actively participating member of the System on or after


July 1, 1998, except for those employees provided in subparagraph


(e) of paragraph (14) of Section 902 of this title, whose employment

Req. No. 699 Page 47

RBS No. 699

is less than full-time, shall have his or her final average


compensation calculated on an annualized basis using his or her


hourly wage subject to the maximum compensation limits; provided,


however, any such member whose first participating service occurred


before July 1, 2013, and who has at least three (3) years of full-


time employment during the last ten (10) years immediately preceding


termination or retirement shall not be eligible for the


annualization provisions contained herein; and provided further, any


such member whose first participating service occurred on or after


July 1, 2013, and who has at least five (5) years of full-time


employment during the last ten (10) years immediately preceding


termination or retirement shall not be eligible for the


annualization provisions contained herein. The Board of Trustees


shall promulgate such administrative rules as are necessary to


implement the provisions of this subsection.


SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 74 O.S. 2021, Section 916.3, as


amended by Section 3, Chapter 280, O.S.L. 2024 (74 O.S. Supp. 2024,


Section 916.3), is amended to read as follows:


Section 916.3. A. Notwithstanding the provisions of Sections


Section 901 through 932 of this title et seq. of this title, a


monthly pension, as provided in subsection B of this section, shall


be paid on behalf of any member who is a:


1. Correctional officer or probation and parole officer of the


Department of Corrections and who is killed or mortally wounded on

Req. No. 699 Page 48

RBS No. 699

or after January 1, 2000, during the performance of the member’s


duties for the Department or any employee of the Department of


Corrections who is killed or mortally wounded after June 30, 2004,


during the performance of the member’s duties for the Department;


2. Deputy sheriff or county jailer first hired on or after


November 1, 2020, by any county that is a participating member in


the Oklahoma Public Employees Retirement System, and who is killed


or mortally wounded during the performance of the member’s duties as


a deputy sheriff or jailer; and


3. Deputy sheriff or county jailer first hired before November


1, 2020, by any county that is a participating employer in the


System, and who is killed or mortally wounded during the performance


of the member’s duties for the participating county on or after


November 1, 2024;


4. Law enforcement agent certified by the Council on Law


Enforcement Education and Training (CLEET) and employed by the


Department of Human Services Office of Inspector General, and who is


killed or mortally wounded on or after the effective date of this


act, during the performance of his or her duties for the Department;


and


5. Resident Care Specialist employed by the Office of Juvenile


Affairs who is killed or mortally wounded on or after the effective


date of this act, during the performance of his or her duties for


the Office.

Req. No. 699 Page 49

RBS No. 699

B. The monthly benefit shall be equal to:


1. Two and one-half percent (2 1/2%);


2. Multiplied by twenty (20) years of service, regardless of


the actual number of years of credited service performed by the


member prior to death, if the member had performed less than twenty


(20) years of credited service, or the actual number of years of


credited service of the member if greater than twenty (20) years;


3. Multiplied by the member’s final average compensation; and


4. Divided by 12.


C. The pension provided for in subsection A of this section


shall be paid:


1. Except as provided in subsection D of this section, to the


surviving spouse for life; or


2. If there is no surviving spouse or upon the death of the


surviving spouse:


a. to the surviving child or children of said the member


or legal guardian of such child or children for such


time as such child or children are under the age of


eighteen (18) years, or


b. to the surviving child or children between the age of


eighteen (18) and twenty-two (22) years if the child


is enrolled full time full-time in and is regularly


attending a public or private school or any


institution of higher education.

Req. No. 699 Page 50

RBS No. 699

D. No surviving spouse shall receive benefits from this


section, Section 49-113 of Title 11 of the Oklahoma Statutes,


Section 50-117 of Title 11 of the Oklahoma Statutes, or Section 2-


306 of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes as the surviving spouse of


more than one member of the Oklahoma Firefighters Pension and


Retirement System, the Oklahoma Police Pension and Retirement


System, the Oklahoma Law Enforcement Retirement System, or the


Oklahoma Public Employees Retirement System. The surviving spouse


of more than one member shall elect which member’s benefits he or


she will receive.


E. In addition to the pension above provided for, if said such


member leaves one or more children under the age of eighteen (18)


years or under the age of twenty-two (22) years if the child is


enrolled full-time in and is regularly attending a public or private


school or any institution of higher education, Four Hundred Dollars


($400.00) a month shall be paid to the surviving spouse or to the


person having the care and custody of such child or children if


there is no surviving spouse or if the surviving spouse dies and


until each child reaches the age of eighteen (18) years or reaches


the age of twenty-two (22) years if the child is enrolled full-time


in and is regularly attending a public or private school or any


institution of higher education.


F. The pension benefit provided in this section shall be made


prospectively only from the effective date of this act July 1, 2000.

Req. No. 699 Page 51

RBS No. 699

The benefits shall be payable beginning the later of the first day


of the month following the date that such employee was killed or


dies from a mortal wound, as provided in this section, or the


effective date of this act July 1, 2000.


G. The Board of the Oklahoma Public Employees Retirement System


Board of Trustees shall promulgate such rules as are necessary to


implement the provisions of this section.


SECTION 4. AMENDATORY 74 O.S. 2021, Section 919.1, as


amended by Section 4, Chapter 280, O.S.L. 2024 (74 O.S. Supp. 2024,


Section 919.1), is amended to read as follows:


Section 919.1. (1) Employee contributions to the Oklahoma


Public Employees Retirement System shall be:


(a) for employees except as otherwise provided in


paragraphs (b), (c), (d), (e), (f), and (g), and (h)


of this subsection: beginning July 1, 2006, and


thereafter, three and one-half percent (3.5%) (3 1/2%)


of allowable annual compensation;


(b) for correctional officers and probation and parole


officers employed by the Department of Corrections:


beginning July 1, 1998, and thereafter, and for


correctional officers or probation and parole officers


who are in such position on June 30, 2004, or who are


hired after June 30, 2004, and who receive a promotion


or change in job classification after June 30, 2004,

Req. No. 699 Page 52

RBS No. 699

to another position in the Department of Corrections,


so long as such officers have at least five (5) years


of service as a correctional officer or probation and


parole officer, eight percent (8%) of allowable


compensation as provided in paragraph (9) of Section


902 of this title;


(c) for fugitive apprehension agents who are employed with


the Department of Corrections on or after July 1,


2002, and for fugitive apprehension agents who are in


such position on June 30, 2004, or who are hired after


June 30, 2004, and who receive a promotion or change


in job classification after June 30, 2004, to another


position in the Department of Corrections, so long as


such agents have at least five (5) years of service as


a fugitive apprehension agent, eight percent (8%) of


allowable compensation as provided in paragraph (9) of


Section 902 of this title;


(d) for firefighters of the Oklahoma Military Department


of the State of Oklahoma first employed beginning July


1, 2002, and thereafter, and such firefighters who


performed service prior to July 1, 2002, for the


Oklahoma Military Department of the State of Oklahoma


and who make the election authorized by division (1)


of subparagraph b of paragraph (9) of subsection A of

Req. No. 699 Page 53

RBS No. 699

Section 915 of this title who perform service on or


after July 1, 2002, in such capacity, eight percent


(8%) of allowable compensation as provided in


subsection paragraph (9) of Section 902 of this title;


(e) for all public safety officers of the Grand River Dam


Authority as defined by paragraph (37) of Section 902


of this title, eight percent (8%) of allowable


compensation as provided in paragraph (9) of Section


902 of this title;


(f) for deputy sheriffs and county jailers employed by any


county that is a participating employer in the System


for the first time as a deputy sheriff or jailer on or


after November 1, 2020, or beginning November 1, 2024,


those deputy sheriffs and county jailers employed by


any county that is a participating employer in the


System for the first time as a deputy sheriff or


county jailer before November 1, 2020, eight percent


(8%) of allowable compensation as provided in


paragraph (9) of Section 902 of this title; and


(g) for all law enforcement agents of the Department of


Human Services Office of Inspector General certified


by the Council on Law Enforcement Education and


Training (CLEET), eight percent (8%) of allowable



Req. No. 699 Page 54

RBS No. 699

compensation as provided in paragraph (9) of


subsection A of Section 915 of this title; and


(h) for all employees except those who make contributions


pursuant to paragraphs (b), (c), (d), (e) and, (f),


and (g) of this subsection who make an irrevocable


written election pursuant to paragraph (2) of


subsection A of Section 915 of this title: six and


forty-one one-hundredths percent (6.41%) of allowable


annual compensation.


The contributions required by paragraphs (b), (c), (d), (e), and


(f), and (g) of this subsection shall be made by a member for not


more than twenty (20) years and thereafter shall be as provided in


paragraph (a) of this subsection.


(2) Contributions shall be deducted by each state agency by the


participating employer for such benefits as the Oklahoma Public


Employees Retirement System Board of Trustees is authorized to


administer as provided for by law. Employee and employer


contributions shall be remitted monthly, or as the Board may


otherwise provide, to the Executive Director for deposit in the


Oklahoma Public Employees Retirement Fund.


(3) Each participating employer shall pick up under the


provisions of Section 414(h)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code of


1986, as amended, and pay the contribution which the member is


required by law to make to the System for all compensation earned

Req. No. 699 Page 55

RBS No. 699

after December 31, 1988. Although the contributions so picked up


are designated as member contributions, such contributions shall be


treated as contributions being paid by the participating employer in


lieu of contributions by the member in determining tax treatment


under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, and such picked


up contributions shall not be includable in the gross income of the


member until such amounts are distributed or made available to the


member or the beneficiary of the member. The member, by the terms


of this System, shall not have any option to choose to receive the


contributions so picked up directly and the picked up contributions


must be paid by the participating employer to the System.


Member contributions which are picked up shall be treated in the


same manner and to the same extent as member contributions made


prior to the date on which member contributions were picked up by


the participating employer. Member contributions so picked up shall


be included in gross salary for purposes of determining benefits and


contributions under the System.


The participating employer shall pay the member contributions


from the same source of funds used in paying salary to the member,


by effecting an equal cash reduction in gross salary of the member.


(4) By September 1, 1989, the System shall refund the


accumulated employee contributions of any member who elects to


retain the member’s membership in the Teachers’ Retirement System of


Oklahoma, in accordance with Section 17-104 of Title 70 of the

Req. No. 699 Page 56

RBS No. 699

Oklahoma Statutes, to such member. Upon the refund of the


accumulated employee contributions referred to in this subsection,


all benefits and rights accrued to such member are terminated.


SECTION 5. AMENDATORY 74 O.S. 2021, Section 935.2, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 935.2. A. The Oklahoma Public Employees Retirement


System (System) shall establish a defined contribution system for


those persons who first become employed in a full-time equivalent


full-time-equivalent position or a position which is less than full-


time but more than half-time position and which qualifies for


employee benefits, including, but not limited to, health insurance


and leave time by any participating employer of the System, as


defined by paragraph (25) of Section 902 of this title, on or after


November 1, 2015. Any person first licensed by the State Department


of Rehabilitation Services as a vending stand operator or managing


operator on or after November 1, 2015, as defined by Section 929 of


this title, shall be eligible for participation in the defined


contribution system.


B. The provisions of subsection A of this section and the


provisions of this act the Retirement Freedom Act shall not be


applicable to employees who are initially employed in the positions


described in division (i), (ii), (iii), or (iv), (v), (vi), (vii),


or (viii) of subparagraph (d) of paragraph (24) of Section 902 of


this title, district attorneys, assistant district attorneys or

Req. No. 699 Page 57

RBS No. 699

other employees of the district attorney’s office, and any employees


of a county, county elected officials, county hospital, city or


town, conservation district, circuit engineering district, and any


public or private trust in which a county, city or town participates


and is the primary beneficiary.


C. An employee described by subsection A of this section shall


become a participant in the defined contribution system and the


employee shall not accrue any service credit in the Oklahoma Public


Employees Retirement System as established pursuant to Section 901


et seq. of this title.


D. Employees who participate in the defined contribution system


shall be deemed to begin service in the defined contribution system


on the first day of the month following employment.


E. An employee who begins participating in the defined benefit


plan on or after November 1, 2015, in one of the positions described


in subsection B of this section, shall continue to participate in


the defined benefit plan only as long as he or she continues to be


employed in a position described in subsection B of this section.


F. Any employee employed on or after November 1, 2015, by the


Legislative Service Bureau, State Senate or House of Representatives


for the full duration of a regular legislative session shall be


eligible for membership only in the defined contribution system


regardless of classification as a temporary employee. The temporary


session employee may participate in the defined contribution system

Req. No. 699 Page 58

RBS No. 699

during the regular legislative session at the option of the


employee. Once the temporary session employee makes a choice to


participate, the choice shall be binding for all future legislative


sessions during which the temporary session employee is employed.


For purposes of this subparagraph subsection, the determination of


whether an employee is employed for the full duration of a regular


legislative session shall be made by the employer.




60-1-699 RD 12/30/2024 1:23:03 PM































Req. No. 699 Page 59